District of Columbia statutes.
50-2301.07

Regulations.

The Director is authorized to promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 107, 25 DCR 1275

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2305.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-607.
1973 Ed., § 40-1107.